fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-ninîkihik_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ninîkihik / -nîkihikw- - ok : # -m animate dependent noun, fingernail; claw	AEW NDA3
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: ninîkihik
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kinîkihik
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: ninîkihikonân
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kinîkihikonaw
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kinîkihikowâw

     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: ninîkihikwa
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kinîkihikwa
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: ninîkihikonâna
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kinîkihikonawa
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kinîkihikowâwa

     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: onîkihikwa
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: onîkihikowâwa
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: onîkihikoyiwa

     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: ninîkihikwak
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kinîkihikwak
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: ninîkihikonânak
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kinîkihikonawak
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kinîkihikowâwak

     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [ninîkihikos,     ninîkihikosis]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kinîkihikos,     kinîkihikosis]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [ninîkihikosinân, ninîkihikosisinân]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kinîkihikosinaw, kinîkihikosisinaw]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kinîkihikosiwâw, kinîkihikosisiwâw]

     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [onîkihikosa,     onîkihikosisa]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [onîkihikosiwâwa, onîkihikosisiwâwa]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [onîkihikosiyiwa, onîkihikosisiyiwa]

     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [ninîkihikosak,     ninîkihikosisak]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kinîkihikosak,     kinîkihikosisak]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [ninîkihikosinânak, ninîkihikosisinânak]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kinîkihikosinawak, kinîkihikosisinawak]
     ninîkihik+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kinîkihikosiwâwak, kinîkihikosisiwâwak]
